North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 1. Records.

§ 55-16-01.
Corporate records.

A corporation shall maintain the following records:

Its articles of incorporation as currently in effect.

Its bylaws as currently in effect.

All written communications within the past three years to shareholders generally.

Minutes of all meetings of, and records of all actions taken without a meeting by, its shareholders, its board of directors, and board committees established under section

G.S. 55-8-25

.

A list of the names and business addresses of its current directors and officers.

Its most recent annual report delivered as required by

G.S. 55-16-22

.

A corporation shall maintain all annual financial statements prepared for the corporation for its last three fiscal years, or each year of its existence if shorter than three years, and any audit or other reports with respect to the financial statements.

A corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its current shareholders, in alphabetical order by class of shares showing the number and class of shares held by each shareholder.

A corporation shall maintain accounting records in a form that permits preparation of its financial statements.

A corporation shall maintain the records specified in this section in a manner so that they may be made available for inspection within a reasonable time.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 38, 45; Rev., ss. 1180, 1181; C.S., s. 1170; G.S., s. 55-107; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 14; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1997-475, s. 6.6; 2021-106, s. 6(a).

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Records to be Maintained

Minutes and Related Documents

Financial Statements and Accounting Records

Shareholders’ Lists

Section 16.01(a) requires certain basic records to be maintained by the corporation. The Act does not generally specify how records must be maintained (other than in a manner so that they may be made available for inspection within a reasonable time), where they must be located or, with the exception of section 16.02(a), where they must be available. They may be maintained in one or more offices within or without the state and in some cases, such as shareholder records, may be maintained by agents of the corporation; indeed, in the case of records in intangible form, it may be impossible to determine where they are located.

Section 16.01(a) does not address the amount of detail that should appear in minutes or written actions. Minutes of meetings customarily include the formalities of notice, the time and place of the meeting, those in attendance, and the results of any votes. Minutes of meetings and written actions without a meeting show formal action taken. The extent to which further detail is included is a matter of judgment which may depend upon the circumstances. Section 7.04, which addresses written actions taken by shareholders, requires that written consents by shareholders be delivered to the corporation for filing with corporate records.

The Act does not provide normative standards for the financial statements and accounting records to be prepared or maintained. The financial statements to be maintained under section 16.01(b) are those that the corporation prepares in the operation of its business, including in response to third party requirements. The form of the financial statements prepared by a corporation depends to some extent on the nature and complexity of the corporation’s business and third party requirements such as those governing the preparation and filing of tax returns with applicable tax authorities. To accommodate the needs of the many different types of business corporations that may be subject to these provisions, including closely held corporations, the Act does not require that the corporation prepare and maintain financial statements on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”) if it is not otherwise required to prepare GAAP financial statements. The Act does not define what accounting records must be maintained or mandate how long they must be maintained. The accounting records to be maintained under section 16.01(c) depend upon the form of the corporation’s financial statements. For example, annual tax returns filed with the relevant taxing authorities may be the only annual financial statements prepared by small businesses operating on a cash basis and, in those instances, the requisite accounting records to be maintained might consist of only a check register, vouchers and receipts.

Section 16.01(d) requires the corporation to maintain such records of its shareholders as will permit it to compile a list of current shareholders when required. These records may vary from stubs from which certificates have been detached in the case of corporations with a few shareholders to elaborate electronic data in the case of large corporations whose shares are publicly traded. The record may be maintained by the corporation or an agent, who traditionally is the transfer agent but may be another agent. A corporation may maintain additional information regarding its shareholders, such as a list of nominees and nonobjecting beneficial owners if its shares are publicly traded.

Revised North Carolina Commentary (2021)

In 2016, Chapter 16 of the Model Act was significantly revised to, among other things, modernize (i) the obligations of corporations to make financial statements available to shareholders, (ii) the maintenance of corporate records, and (iii) shareholder inspection rights. Effective October 1, 2021,

G.S. 55-16-01

was revised consistent with the Model Act to provide increased flexibility to corporations and allow for recordkeeping approaches that are in common use (e.g., using technology and electronic storage rather than paper-based practices), while preserving a corporation’s obligation to retain key organizational, governance, financial and accounting records that may be available for shareholder inspection under the North Carolina Business Corporation Act.

One important change is that the corporation will no longer be required to maintain particular records at its principal office. This change reflects the reality that corporations may effectively maintain records in offices either within or outside North Carolina, with agents, or in an electronic format (e.g., a cloud-based solution) in which a physical “location” cannot be determined or described. As amended,

G.S. 55-16-01

no longer requires that the relevant records be maintained “in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time” but instead simply requires that they be maintained “in a manner that may be made available for inspection within a reasonable time,” which allows records to be maintained in a variety of non-paper formats (including electronically), but ensures that a qualified shareholder entitled to inspect records will have access within a reasonable time.

As holders of a financial interest in a corporation, shareholders generally have the right to review certain records and information maintained by the corporation. These rights are commonly referred to as “inspection rights.” In North Carolina and many other states, as well as in the Model Act, shareholder inspection rights fall into two distinct categories: (1) absolute rights to inspect certain fundamental corporate documents and (2) qualified rights to inspect other documents for a proper purpose. With one exception and in contrast to the Model Act, the North Carolina Business Corporation Act prior to the 2021 amendments granted both absolute and qualified inspection rights only to “qualified shareholders” who have been shareholders of the corporation for at least six months or hold at least five percent of the outstanding shares. This concept was carried forward in the 2021 amendments.

Records subject to absolute rights - such as the corporation’s articles of incorporation, written communications from the corporation to shareholders and minutes of shareholders’ meetings - while not all publicly available, are not likely to contain sensitive information. In contrast, records subject to qualified inspection rights, which include the corporation’s financial statements, accounting records and records of final action taken by the board of directors or a board committee, are much more likely to contain competitively sensitive and potentially proprietary information. Accordingly, while a qualified shareholder may have a genuine interest in reviewing this information, the corporation likewise has a legitimate business interest in protecting its confidentiality and restricting its use.

In recognition of the corporation’s interest, the changes in

G.S. 55-16-02(c1)

and G.S. 55-16-20(d)(1), respectively, allow corporations to impose reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use and distribution of records that are subject to qualified inspection rights or of financial statements being delivered to a shareholder. Similarly, in the event of a court-ordered inspection of records under

G.S. 55-16-04

or delivery of financial statements under G.S. 55-16-20(e), the changes to

G.S. 55-16-04

(c) and G.S. 55-16-20(e)(2), respectively, allow the court to impose reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use and distribution of records or of the financial statements by the shareholder. Likewise, G.S. 55-16-04(c) and G.S. 55-16-20(e)(5), respectively, now create an exception to the requirement that the corporation pay the shareholder’s legal expenses of obtaining a court order if the corporation establishes that it refused inspection or to deliver financial statements in good faith because the shareholder was unwilling to agree to reasonable restrictions on confidentiality, use or distribution proposed by the corporation.

§ 55-16-01.1.
Definitions.

In this Article, the following definitions apply:

Reserved.

Reserved.

Qualified shareholder. — A person who has been a shareholder in the corporation for at least six months immediately preceding the shareholder’s demand for inspection of records or who holds at least five percent (5%) of the corporation’s outstanding shares of any class.

Shareholder. — A record shareholder or a beneficial shareholder whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the beneficial shareholder’s behalf and whose beneficial ownership is certified to the corporation by that voting trust or nominee.

History.

2021-106, s. 6(b).

North Carolina Commentary

The inspection rights created by

G.S. 55-16-02

are limited to “qualified” shareholders as defined in subdivision (3) of this section, a limitation not found in the Model Act. The concept of “qualified shareholder” was brought forward in 1989 in

G.S. 55-16-02

, with slight modifications, from former G.S. 55-38(a). In contrast to the Model Act, subdivision (4) of this section provides that a beneficial owner who wishes to exercise inspection rights under Article 16 must have their ownership certified to the corporation by the record holder in order to be a “shareholder” for purposes of the inspection rights set forth in G.S. 55-16-02.

§ 55-16-02.
Inspection of records by shareholders.

A qualified shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the corporation’s principal office, any of the records of the corporation described in G.S. 55-16-01(a), excluding minutes of meetings of, and records of actions taken without a meeting by, the corporation’s board of directors and board committees established under

G.S. 55-8-25

, if the qualified shareholder gives the corporation written notice of the qualified shareholder’s demand at least five business days before the date on which the qualified shareholder wishes to inspect and copy.

A qualified shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the qualified shareholder meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and gives the corporation written notice of the qualified shareholder’s demand at least five business days before the date on which the qualified shareholder wishes to inspect and copy:

Records of any final action taken with or without a meeting by the board of directors, or by a committee of the board of directors while acting in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation maintained in accordance with G.S. 55-16-01(a).

Accounting records of the corporation.

The record of shareholders maintained in accordance with G.S. 55-16-01(c).

The financial statements of the corporation maintained in accordance with G.S. 55-16-01(b).

A shareholder of a public corporation is not entitled to inspect or copy any accounting records of the corporation or any records of the corporation with respect to any matter which the corporation determines in good faith may, if disclosed, adversely affect the corporation in the conduct of its business or may constitute material nonpublic information at the time the shareholder’s notice of demand to inspect and copy is received by the corporation.

A qualified shareholder may inspect and copy the records described in subsection (b) only if all of the following apply:

The qualified shareholder’s demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose.

The qualified shareholder describes with reasonable particularity the qualified shareholder’s purpose and the records the qualified shareholder desires to inspect.

The records are directly connected with the qualified shareholder’s purpose.

(c1)

The corporation may impose reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use, or distribution of records described in subsection (b) of this section.

The right of inspection granted by this section shall not be abolished or limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.

This section does not affect any of the following:

The right of a shareholder to inspect records under

G.S. 55-7-20

or, if the shareholder is in litigation with the corporation, to inspect the records to the same extent as any other litigant.

The power of a court, independently of this Chapter, to compel the production of corporate records for examination and to impose reasonable restrictions as provided in G.S. 55-16-04(c), so long as, in the case of production of records described in subsection (b) of this section at the request of a qualified shareholder, the qualified shareholder has met the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.

, (g) Repealed by Session Laws 2021-106, s. 6(c), effective October 1, 2021, and applicable to demands for inspection and requests for financial statements received by a corporation on or after that date.

(h)

A qualified shareholder of a corporation that has the power to elect, appoint, or designate a majority of the directors of another domestic or foreign corporation or of a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation, has the inspection rights provided in this section with respect to the records of that other corporation.

(i)

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other provisions of this Chapter or interpretations to the contrary, a shareholder of a public corporation has no common law rights to inspect or copy any accounting records of the corporation or any other records of the corporation that may not be inspected or copied by a shareholder of a public corporation as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 38, 45, 49; Rev., ss. 1179-1181; C.S., ss. 1170, 1172; G.S., ss. 55-107, 55-109; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1965, c. 609; 1973, c. 469, s. 11; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.26; 1993, c. 552, s. 19; 2021-106, s. 6(c).

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Section 16.02(a)

Section 16.02(b)

Section 16.02(c)

Section 16.02(d)

Section 16.02(e)

Sections 16.02(f) and (g)

Under section 16.02(a), each shareholder is entitled to inspect all documents that deal with the shareholder’s interest in the corporation. The right to inspection includes the right to make copies, as further described in section 16.03. Although some of these documents may also be a matter of public record in the office of the secretary of state, a shareholder should not be compelled to go to a public office that may be physically distant to examine the basic documents relating to the corporation. The “principal office” of the corporation is defined in section 1.40 to be the location of the executive offices of the corporation at its address as set forth by the corporation in its annual report required by section 16.21.

In contrast to the right to inspect minutes of meetings of, and written actions taken without a meeting by, shareholders, a shareholder is entitled to inspect only excerpts of meetings of, and records of written actions taken by, the board of directors and board committees related to the purpose of the inspection. A shareholder is entitled to inspect the record of shareholders under section 16.02(b) without regard to the size or value of the shareholder’s holding. This right is independent of the right to inspect a shareholders’ list under section 7.20.

Section 16.02(c) permits inspection of the financial statements and records described in section 16.02(b) by a shareholder only if the demand is made in good faith and for a “proper purpose.” Although not defined in the Act, “proper purpose” under section 16.02(c) has been defined in case law to involve a purpose that is reasonably relevant to the demanding shareholder’s interest as a shareholder. Section 16.02(c) requires that a shareholder designate “with reasonable particularity” the purpose for the demand and the records he or she desires to inspect. Also, the records demanded must be “directly connected” with that purpose. If disputed by the corporation, the “connection” of the records to the shareholder’s purpose may be determined by a court’s examination of the records.

The reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use or distribution of financial statements and records permitted by section 16.02(d) allow for the protection of confidential or proprietary information in the corporation’s records or sensitive matters that might be disclosed in a shareholder inspection. Such restrictions might include, for example, requiring the demanding shareholder to sign a confidentiality and use agreement. A similar provision is found in section 16.04(d) in connection with court ordered inspections.

Section 16.02(e) provides shareholders of a corporation the right to receive from the corporation the notice and other information provided by the corporation to shareholders in connection with a meeting if the record date for voting is subsequent to the record date for notice and the shareholder became entitled to vote after the record date for notice. This provision does not apply to information provided to shareholders by persons other than the corporation.

The prohibition in section 16.02(f) does not apply to a shareholder agreement permissible under section 7.32. No inference should be drawn from the prohibition in section 16.02(f) as to whether other, unrelated sections of the Act may be modified by provisions in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. Section 16.02(g) preserves whatever independent rights of inspection exist under the referenced sources and does not create any rights, either expressly or by implication. A shareholder also has the right to obtain financial statements under section 16.20.

Revised North Carolina Commentary (2021)

Subsection (b) of this section further restricts the inspection rights of shareholders of public corporations in a manner not found in the Model Act, by protecting from inspection the accounting records of such corporations and any other records the disclosure of which the corporation determines in good faith would constitute material nonpublic information.

§ 55-16-03.
Scope of inspection right.

A qualified shareholder may appoint an agent or attorney to exercise the qualified shareholder’s inspection and copying rights under

G.S. 55-16-02

.

The corporation may, if reasonable, satisfy the right of a qualified shareholder to copy records under

G.S. 55-16-02

by furnishing to the qualified shareholder copies by photocopy or other means chosen by the corporation, including copies through an electronic transmission.

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge to cover the costs of providing copies of documents to the qualified shareholder, which may be based on an estimate of the costs.

The corporation may comply with a qualified shareholder’s demand to inspect the record of shareholders under G.S. 55-16-02(b)(3) by providing the shareholder with a list of its shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of the qualified shareholder’s demand.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 49; Rev., s. 1179; C.S., s. 1172; G.S., s. 55-109; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1965, c. 609; 1973, c. 469, s. 11; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2005-268, s. 35; 2021-106, s. 6(d).

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Section 16.03(a) provides that the rights of inspection and copying granted to shareholders in section 16.02 may be exercised by agents and attorneys of shareholders appointed by shareholders to conduct such inspection and copying. Providing the corporation with the right to choose among alternative delivery methods for copies in section 16.03(b), including by electronic transmissions, is intended to reduce burdens on the corporation. No consent by the shareholder is required under section 1.41 for the corporation to furnish copies to the shareholder under section 16.03 by electronic transmission.

Section 16.03(c) gives the corporation, at its option and expense, the right to provide a list of its shareholders instead of granting the right of inspection. Such a list must be compiled no earlier than the date of the written demand.

Section 16.03(d) permits the corporation to be reimbursed for the expense of providing copies of documents to a shareholder.

North Carolina Commentary

Former G.S. 55-38 contained no express counterpart to subsections (b), (c) and (d) of this section.

Subsection 16.03 (c) of the Model Act was modified for clarity.

§ 55-16-04.
Court-ordered inspection.

If a corporation does not allow a qualified shareholder who complies with

G.S. 55-16-02(a)

to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the superior court of the county where the corporation’s principal office, or if none in this State, its registered office, is located may, upon application of the qualified shareholder, summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation’s expense.

If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a qualified shareholder who complies with

G.S. 55-16-02(b)

to inspect and copy the records required by that subsection, the qualified shareholder who complies with

G.S. 55-16-02(b)

and (c) may apply to the superior court in the county where the corporation’s principal office, or if none in this State, its registered office, is located for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on their confidentiality, use, or distribution by the demanding qualified shareholder, and it shall also order the corporation to pay the qualified shareholder’s costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, incurred to obtain the order unless the corporation establishes that it refused inspection in good faith due to any of the following:

The corporation had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder to inspect the records demanded.

The corporation required reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use, or distribution of the records demanded to which the demanding qualified shareholder had been unwilling to agree.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-106, s. 6(e), effective October 1, 2021, and applicable to demands for inspection and requests for financial statements received by a corporation on or after that date.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 49; Rev., s. 1179; C.S., s. 1172; G.S., s. 55-109; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1965, c. 609; 1973, c. 469, s. 11; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2021-106, s. 6(e).

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Section 16.04 provides a judicial remedy if a corporation refuses to grant the right of inspection provided by section 16.02.

If the right of inspection under section 16.02(a) is invoked and the corporation refuses to grant inspection, the shareholder may seek a summary order compelling inspection at the corporation’s expense. A summary order is appropriate since the right of inspection under section 16.02(a) is either automatic or subject only to a determination that the person is in fact a shareholder of the corporation. By contrast, if inspection is demanded under section 16.02(b), a number of matters may be at issue, including the shareholder’s good faith and proper purpose for demands under section 16.02(c) or the reasonableness of the restrictions required by the corporation on the confidentiality, use or distribution of the records. Accordingly, section 16.04(b) directs the court to handle the proceeding “on an expedited basis” instead of in a summary proceeding. The purpose of this phrase is to discourage dilatory tactics to avoid or delay inspection without requiring the court to resolve these issues on a summary basis.

The principal sanction against unreasonable delay or refusal to grant inspection is provided by section 16.04(c), which imposes on the corporation the shareholder’s expenses to obtain the order unless the corporation establishes that it refused inspection in good faith on the grounds specified in section 16.04(c)(1) or (2). For example, a corporation may point to conduct of the shareholder involving improper use of information obtained from the corporation in the past as indicating that reasonable doubt existed as to the shareholder’s present purpose or by showing that the corporation refused inspection because the shareholder had been unwilling to agree to reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use or distribution of records demanded under section 16.02(b).

North Carolina Commentary

The sanction for wrongfully withholding records under this section is the payment of the costs and attorneys’ fees of the shareholder, whereas former G.S. 55-38 permitted the court to impose a fine not exceeding $500.

§ 55-16-05.
Inspection of records by directors.

A director of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy the books, records, and documents of the corporation at any reasonable time to the extent reasonably related to the performance of the director’s duties as a director, including duties as a member of a committee, but not for any other purpose or in any manner that would violate any duty to the corporation.

The superior court of the county where the corporation’s principal office, or its registered office if the corporation does not have a principal office in this State, is located may order inspection and copying of the books, records, and documents at the corporation’s expense, upon application of a director who has been refused inspection rights, unless the corporation establishes that the director is not entitled to inspection rights. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If an order is issued, the court may include provisions protecting the corporation from undue burden or expense, and prohibiting the director from using information obtained upon exercise of the inspection rights in a manner that would violate a duty to the corporation, and may also order the corporation to reimburse the director for the director’s costs, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred in connection with the application.

History.

2005-268, s. 36.

§ 55-16-06.
Exception to notice requirements.

Whenever notice is required to be given under any provision of this Chapter to a shareholder, the notice shall not be required to be given if either of the following applies:

Notice of two consecutive annual meetings, and all notices of meetings during the period between those two consecutive annual meetings, have been sent to the shareholder at the shareholder’s address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable.

All, but not less than two, payments of dividends on securities during a 12-month period, or two consecutive payments of dividends on securities during a period of more than 12 months, have been sent to the shareholder at the shareholder’s address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable.

If a shareholder delivers to the corporation a written notice setting forth that shareholder’s current address, the requirement that notice be given to the shareholder shall be reinstated.

History.

2005-268, s. 36.

§§ 55-16-07 through 55-16-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.